North Carolina, session 2025, SB602.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. For purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Eligible building. – A commercial building or structure that meets all of the
following:
a. The building or structure is located in a Helene-affected county, as
defined by this section, that existed prior to September 27, 2024 and
was directly damaged or destroyed by Hurricane Helene.
b. The building or structure must be solely classified as a commercial
occupancy under the North Carolina State Building Code and not
classified under any residential or mixed-use occupancy group in the
North Carolina State Building Code.
c. The building or structure must be located within the central business
district or downtown commercial district of a city or town, as defined
by that municipality's governing board or zoning maps.
d. The building or structure must be undergoing reconstruction,
rebuilding, rehabilitation, or repair solely for the purpose of restoring
the building to substantially its previous condition, use, occupancy,
and size, without expanding its original footprint, height, or changing
its occupancy classification under the North Carolina State Building
Code.
(2) Fire-resistant window requirements. – Any provision of the North Carolina
State Building Code, including the Building Code and the Residential Code,
requiring the installation of fire-resistant or fire-rated windows, window
glazing, or other fire-rated opening protections for exterior or interior wall
openings when constructing, altering, or repairing a building. This includes
window requirements for fire protection based on building use, occupancy,
proximity to property lines, fire separation distance, interior fire barriers,
corridors, partitions, or location in fire-prone areas.
(3) Helene-affected county. – Any county in North Carolina declared a major
disaster by the President of the United States under the Stafford Act (P.L.
93-288) as a result of Hurricane Helene.
*S602-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(a) Window Exemption for Eligible Buildings. – Notwithstanding any
provision of the North Carolina State Building Code, G.S. 143-138, or any other law to the
contrary, the owner of an eligible building may elect to reconstruct or repair the building with
window assemblies having the same fire-protection rating that existed in the building as of
September 27, 2024, without being required to upgrade to the current fire-resistant window
assemblies required by the State Building Code. This exemption applies solely to the State
Building Code provisions mandating a higher or upgraded fire-protection rating or fire-resistant
glazing for window openings. This exemption is available only when the work on the eligible
building is solely to restore damage caused by Hurricane Helene and does not include additions
or changes that would otherwise trigger the higher fire-resistant window requirements.
SECTION 2.(b) Limitation on Exemption. – If the exemption provided by this act
is elected for an eligible building, all other applicable provisions of the State Building Code shall
remain in full force and effect. The exemption provided by this section does not relieve the
building from compliance with other fire safety or State Building Code requirements.
SECTION 2.(c) Required Affidavit. – A building owner electing to utilize the
exemption provided by this section shall submit a written affidavit to the local building
inspections department with the building permit application and prior to the installation of any
windows. The affidavit shall be signed by the owner and notarized to constitute a legally binding
statement. The local building inspections department shall retain the affidavit with the building
permit records and note the exemption on the certificate of occupancy. The affidavit shall include
all of the following:
(1) A citation to this act and confirmation that the building qualifies as an eligible
building under subdivision (1) of Section 1 of this act.
(2) A statement that the owner voluntarily assumes any risks associated with not
installing fire-resistant window assemblies.
(3) An acknowledgment that alternative means of fire protection have been
considered and discussed with the project's contractors or design
professionals.
(4) Identification of the specific window installations for which the exemption is
claimed.
SECTION 2.(d) Expiration of Exemption. – To utilize the exemption provided by
this section, an owner shall claim the exemption with submission of their building permit
application within two years of the effective date of this act. Buildings with windows installed
under the exemption may continue to use those windows following the expiration of the two-year
period specified by this section; however, any subsequent renovations or additions shall comply
with the State Building Code as then in effect.
SECTION 2.(e) Liability Protection. – No state or local government, building code
official, inspector, or department shall be liable for any damages arising directly or indirectly
from a building owner's use of the exemption provided by this section.
SECTION 2.(f) Rulemaking. – The Office of the State Fire Marshal and the North
Carolina Building Code Council may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this act. The
Office of the State Fire Marshal shall produce a standard form to provide to local code
enforcement officials that may be provided to building owners upon request for purposes of the
affidavit requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to eligible
buildings for which construction or repair work is commenced on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 602-First Edition